Utah statutes.
63B-1-315.   Tax exemption.

(1)  All property acquired or held by the authority under this part is declared to be public property used for essential public and governmental purposes.

(2)  All property and income from it, and all obligations issued under this part, the interest payable on them, and income derived from them, are exempt from all taxation imposed by this state or any of its political subdivisions, except for the corporate franchise tax.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 86, 2003 General Session

